Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.900

Application of RCW 11.98.130 through 11.98.160—RCW 11.68.090 prevails.

(1) The provisions of RCW 11.98.130 through 11.98.160 are applicable to any instrument purporting to create a trust regardless of the date such instrument bears, unless it has been previously adjudicated in the courts of this state.

(2) To the extent that this chapter is in conflict with RCW 11.68.090, RCW 11.68.090 prevails.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4023; 1985 c 30 s 60. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 93; 1971 ex.s. c 229 s 1; 1965 c 145 s 11.98.050; prior: 1959 c 146 s 5. Formerly RCW 11.98.050.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective date—1959 c 146: The effective date of 1959 c 146, herein reenacted by 1965 c 145 s 11.98.050, was midnight June 10, 1959, see preface 1959 session laws.